Missouri, session 2026, SB1351.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 162.481 and 162.821, RSMo, are repealed and ten new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.068, 160.524, 161.355, 162.192, 162.481,
162.821, 167.1001, 170.027, 186.085, and 186.095, to read as follows:
160.068. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Student
Screen-Time Standards Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Instructional technology", a laptop, tablet, computer, Chromebook, smart
device, software platform, or other similar device or platform used for student learning;
(2) "Manipulatives", hands-on physical learning items including, but not limited
to, blocks, counters, cubes, rulers, cards, science materials, and similar educational
tools;
(3) "Traditional materials", printed books, paper-based workbooks, notebooks,
handwriting materials, and physical educational resources.
3. For elementary school students in kindergarten through grade five, each
school district and charter school shall adopt a written screen time and instructional
technology policy consistent with this section to promote the educational interests of
students, prevent the harmful effects of screen time on child development, ensure that
technology supports rather than supplants foundational learning, and restore evidence-
based practices. The screen time and instructional technology policy shall establish the
following:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS SB 1351 2
(1) Limits and restrictions on student screen time and student use of
instructional technology during the school day;
(2) Limits and restrictions on school district- or charter school-issued devices or
school district or charter school educational technology being used outside the school
day;
(3) Limits and restrictions on student access to internet-connected instructional
technology;
(4) The digital platforms used;
(5) Standards and requirements for student use of manipulatives and traditional
materials;
(6) The process for a parent or guardian to obtain information regarding his or
her child's screen time and instructional technology use and the process for a parent or
guardian to limit or eliminate his or her child's screen time and instructional technology
use; and
(7) The research, evidence, and information upon which the policy is based.
4. In creating the policy, the district or charter school shall consider and
document research on best practices in literacy instruction, instructional technology,
and assessment and the optimal role for the use of handwriting and cursive writing in
promoting literacy for all students.
5. Each elementary school shall notify parents and guardians annually of the
policy adopted under subsection 3 of this section. Parents and guardians of students in
grades kindergarten through five may, upon request, receive information about their
child's login time and use of district-provided instructional technology and online
learning platforms. The district or charter school shall provide such available
information within a reasonable time and at no cost to the parent or guardian.
6. Each elementary school shall publish such policy on such school's website.
7. Each policy adopted under subsection 3 of this section shall be periodically
updated, including incorporating the best practices recommendations from the
recommended model school board policy on screen time and use of technology in
instruction from the framework on classroom use of screens (FOCUS) council created
under section 186.095, when such recommendations become available.
8. This section shall be implemented before the end of the 2027-28 school year
and shall apply for all subsequent school years.
9. This section shall not apply to virtual instruction programs operating under
the provisions of section 161.670.
160.524. 1. (1) The state board of education shall develop an annual school
accountability report card for each public school district, public school, and public

HCS SB 1351 3
charter school in the state for the purpose of providing information about school
performance in accordance with the provisions of this section. In addition to providing
information about student performance, the report card shall be designed to satisfy
federal reporting requirements for the disclosure of information about students, staff,
finances, and other data.
(2) Each school accountability report card shall be designed in a standardized,
clear, and easily accessible form so that the accountability report card can be easily
understood by parents, taxpayers, school personnel, legislators, and the media and shall
include a summary intended for parents and guardians that:
(a) Explains the school's performance level and underlying indicators in
nontechnical terms;
(b) Identifies areas of strength and areas in need of improvement;
(c) Highlights year-to-year progress, including student academic growth; and
(d) Provides information on how families may engage with the school to support
student learning.

The plain-language summary shall include a clear explanation of student academic
growth and how the school's growth compares to the state's expectations.
2. The state board of education shall assign the duties of implementing the
provisions of this section to the department of elementary and secondary education or
may contract with a private entity in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.
3. (1) The state board of education shall provide an embargoed version of the
school accountability report cards for the previous school year to each public school
district, public school, and public charter school by September fifteenth of each year.
(2) The state board of education shall provide an appeals process and criteria for
an appeal of information in the school accountability report card.
(3) Before October thirty-first of each year, each public school district, public
school, and public charter school shall publish in a clear and easily accessible location
on its website the district and school accountability report cards including each
underlying indicator that is used to derive the performance rating and the rates of pupil
attendance from the previous school year.
4. The state board of education shall assign each public school district, public
school, and public charter school one of the following ratings, which shall be based on a
zero-to-one-hundred scale:
(1) "A" for those districts and schools producing excellent student outcomes;
(2) "B" for those districts and schools producing more-than-satisfactory student
outcomes;

HCS SB 1351 4
(3) "C" for those districts and schools producing satisfactory student outcomes;
(4) "D" for those districts and schools producing less-than-satisfactory student
outcomes; and
(5) "F" for those districts and schools failing to produce adequate student
outcomes.
5. (1) The state board of education shall assign each public school district,
public school, and public charter school an overall performance rating of "A", "B",
"C", "D", or "F", derived from multiple measures of school performance as provided
in this section.
(2) The benchmark for excellent student outcomes or an "A" rating shall be the
top decile of the composite score of the measures outlined in subsection 8 of this section.
(3) A public school district, public school, or public charter school that does not
test at least ninety-five percent of its students shall have assessment participation rates
reported separately and clearly identified on the school accountability report card.
Assessment participation rates shall not result in an automatic reduction of the district's
or school's performance level but shall be included to provide transparency and context
for parents and the public.
6. (1) There is hereby created the "Show Me Success Program" to provide
additional funding, subject to appropriation, to public schools and public charter
schools that demonstrate strong student academic growth, sustained improvement over
time, or success in closing achievement gaps, as determined by the department of
elementary and secondary education.
(2) Subject to appropriations, the department may award performance-based
funding to eligible public schools and public charter schools based on one or more of the
following criteria:
(a) Student academic growth above the state average, including value-added
growth and growth to proficiency;
(b) Demonstrated improvement in student outcomes over multiple years;
(c) Significant improvement among historically underserved student groups;
(d) High levels of student readiness for postsecondary education, training, or
employment; or
(e) Demonstrated improvement in early literacy outcomes, including growth in
reading achievement for students in kindergarten through grade three, as measured by
multiple indicators of reading development and progress over time.
(3) The department shall establish, by rule, the methodology for determining
eligibility, award amounts, and distribution of funds under this subsection.

HCS SB 1351 5
(4) No school or charter school shall be guaranteed funding under this
subsection, and awards shall be made only to the extent that funds are appropriated by
the general assembly.
(5) Moneys shall be distributed to the school's fiscal agent before December first
of each year, and one hundred percent of the moneys received shall be placed in the
school's classroom incidental fund to be used in a manner determined by the governing
body of the district or charter school to promote teacher recruitment and retention.
7. (1) The department shall develop a criteria-referenced growth measure,
called "growth to proficiency", in addition to the existing normative value-added
growth measure.
(2) Growth to proficiency shall evaluate for each student with two consecutive
years of Missouri assessment program performance levels whether that student has
made sufficient progress to put them on a trajectory to reach or exceed grade-level
within three years or by the end of grade ten, whichever comes first.
8. The rating under subsection 4 of this section for a public school district, public
school, or public charter school shall be based on the following factors:
(1) Student academic achievement level, calculated as the percentage of students
proficient or higher on required English language arts, math, and science assessments
through the Missouri assessment program;
(2) Student academic growth in English language arts, math, and science using a
growth to proficiency metric and a value-added growth metric of:
(a) All students; and
(b) The lowest-performing quartile of students; and
(3) For high schools:
100 (a) The student four-year graduation rate; and
101 (b) A "Success-Ready Graduate" measure, calculated by the department of
102 elementary and secondary education, which shall include the number of students
103 graduating with merit or distinction and which shall include consideration of:
104 a. Advanced placement examinations upon which students achieve a score of
105 three or higher;
106 b. International baccalaureate examinations for an international baccalaureate
107 diploma programme course upon which students achieve a score of four or higher;
108 c. Dual enrollment in core subjects with a "C" course grade or higher;
109 d. Earning an industry-recognized credential or career technical education
110 certificate related to an occupation that is high wage, high demand;
111 e. Completion of an early bachelor's or associate degree; and
112 f. Completion of stackable credentials.

HCS SB 1351 6
113 9. The rating assigned under subsection 4 of this section for elementary and
114 middle schools shall be based on overall student academic achievement level, value-
115 added growth, and growth to proficiency as follows:
116 (1) Academic achievement level, value-added academic growth, and growth to
117 proficiency shall be calculated and reported separately for English language arts,
118 literacy, math, and science; and
119 (2) As a portion of the rating assigned:
120 (a) Academic achievement level shall represent forty percent of the rating;
121 (b) Value-added growth shall represent thirty percent of the rating; and
122 (c) Growth to proficiency shall represent thirty percent of the rating.
123 10. At least seventy-five percent of the rating assigned under subsection 4 of this
124 section for high schools shall be based on overall student academic achievement level,
125 value-added growth, and growth to proficiency as follows:
126 (1) Academic achievement level, value-added academic growth, and growth to
127 proficiency shall be calculated and reported separately for English language arts, math,
128 and science; and
129 (2) As a portion of the rating assigned:
130 (a) Academic achievement level shall represent twenty-five percent of the rating;
131 (b) Value-added growth shall represent twenty-five percent of the rating;
132 (c) Growth to proficiency shall represent twenty-five percent of the rating;
133 (d) The success-ready graduate measure shall represent fifteen percent of the
134 rating; and
135 (e) The student four-year graduation rate shall represent ten percent of the
136 rating.
137 11. Public school districts, public schools, and public charter schools shall
138 annually report for high schools the number of graduates who within six months of
139 graduation attend postsecondary education or training programs, serve in the military,
140 serve in national or community service, are employed in the farming or ranching
141 industry, or are employed in a living-wage career as determined by a governmental
142 agency or nongovernmental organization with expertise in living-wage calculation.
143 12. For public school districts, the annual school accountability report card
144 rating shall be calculated following the same method used for calculating a school report
145 except at the district level.
146 13. The state board of education shall provide a statewide report card that
147 provides the following:

HCS SB 1351 7
148 (1) The percentages of Missouri students annually attending schools rated "A",
149 "B", "C", "D", or "F", with the objective of increasing the percentage of students
150 attending more highly rated schools each year; and
151 (2) The performance of Missouri students on state assessments relative to the
152 National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP), with the objective that
153 proficiency rates on both assessments be reasonably aligned.
154 14. For the purposes of this section, the development and publication of an
155 annual school accountability report card shall not be required for any special school
156 district or state-operated school in which all of the students enrolled are students with
157 disabilities.
161.355. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Media Literacy
and Critical Thinking Act".
2. As used in this section, "media literacy" means the following:
(1) An individual's ability to access, analyze, evaluate, and participate with all
forms of media, such as:
(a) News in print; and
(b) Social media content, such as images, text, video, and other media content;
(2) An individual's ability to recognize bias and stereotypes in media messages;
(3) The foundational skills of digital citizenship and internet safety; and
(4) In the classroom, media literacy includes integrating the process of critical
analysis of media messages into the daily classroom curricula.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish the
"Media Literacy and Critical Thinking Pilot Program". Such pilot program shall be
implemented and administered during the 2027-28 and 2028-29 school years.
4. Under the media literacy and critical thinking pilot program, the department
of elementary and secondary education shall select five to seven diverse school districts
to participate in the pilot program and from which to study data related to the outcomes
of the pilot program in such school districts.
5. A pilot program site shall:
(1) Address each component of media literacy;
(2) Develop successful strategies for student learning within the daily classroom
curricula in all grades or for a selected preschool to grade twelve level;
(3) Identify high-quality resources for such pilot program; and
(4) Demonstrate and report how such site addresses the following in the
classroom:

HCS SB 1351 8
(a) News content literacy, which is the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, and
distinguish verified information from opinion and propaganda and the opportunity to
practice verification;
(b) Visual literacy, which is the ability to find, interpret, and evaluate images and
visual media such as photographs, videos, illustrations, drawings, maps, diagrams, and
advertisements;
(c) Digital fluency, which is the ability to understand and follow the norms of
safe and responsible technology use and how media influences attitudes and behaviors;
and
(d) Digital literacy, which is the ability to be technically fluent and able to make
informed decisions about content encountered online, recognize how networked
technology affects behavior and perception, and create and effectively communicate
with digital media tools.
6. The guidelines developed as a result of the study of the information gained
from the pilot program shall provide students with the following information:
(1) The purpose and acceptable use of various social media platforms;
(2) Social media behavior that ensures cybersafety, cybersecurity, and cyber
ethics;
(3) The potential negative consequences of failing to use various social media
platforms responsibly, such as cyberbullying;
(4) The ability to access, analyze, evaluate, create, and act on all forms of digital
and written communications;
(5) Digital ethics, etiquette, respectful discourse with individuals who have
differing opinions, safety, security, digital footprints, and the identification of rhetoric
that incites violence;
(6) Cyberbullying prevention and response;
(7) The significance of algorithms;
(8) Ways to identify online misinformation;
(9) A general knowledge of the economic structure of the digital landscape; and
(10) The importance of the right to freedom of speech as contained in the Bill of
Rights of the Constitution of the United States including, but not limited to:
(a) The central role that the right to freedom of speech has in the history of the
United States; and
(b) The applicability of protections for freedom of speech for online interaction
in school settings that the department of elementary and secondary education shall
provide to school districts.

HCS SB 1351 9
7. The guidelines developed as a result of the study of the information gained
from the pilot program shall provide school districts with samples of learning activities,
resources, and training that promote critical thinking and the skills necessary to
evaluate all forms of media.
8. Before August 1, 2029, each pilot program site shall submit a report to the
department of elementary and secondary education describing the implementation of
and the information gained from the pilot program.
9. Before January 1, 2030, the department of elementary and secondary
education shall compile the reports submitted from the pilot program sites and submit a
summary report to the general assembly containing at least the following information:
(1) Qualitative and quantitative insights on how the pilot program sites
addressed media literacy;
(2) A compendium of high-quality strategies and resources used by educators;
(3) Any professional development used or required;
(4) Recommendations about what facilities, instructional materials, and
technologies are needed to implement a media literacy and critical thinking program
statewide;
(5) Exploration of additional policies, administrative mechanisms, and legislative
recommendations for implementing best practices and standards statewide; and
(6) A draft of proposed clear, inclusive media literacy and critical thinking state
standards for preschool to grade twelve, compiled by drawing from key media literacy
skills and competencies in existing state standards and from the pilot program results.
10. Standards developed under this section shall be included for consideration
by the department of elementary and secondary education during the state standards
review immediately following the termination of the pilot program.
11. The media literacy and critical thinking pilot program shall terminate on
June 30, 2029.
12. This section shall expire on December 31, 2029.
162.192. 1. For purposes of this section, "financial ledger" means a searchable,
machine-readable, publicly accessible database maintained by a school district or
charter school that:
(1) Sets forth all financial transactions conducted with school district or charter
school funds, including, but not limited to, the school funds established pursuant to
section 165.011;
(2) Is available without login credentials, registration, or fees;
(3) Is downloadable and exportable in formats including, but not limited to,
comma-separated values (CSV) format and Microsoft Excel format;

HCS SB 1351 10
(4) Records all transactions using Missouri financial accounting manual
classification categories, as applicable; and
(5) Includes the following minimum required data fields for each financial
transaction, and is searchable and filterable by such fields, at minimum:
(a) Transaction date;
(b) Transaction amount;
(c) Revenue or expenditure designation;
(d) Fund code;
(e) Function code;
(f) Object code;
(g) Vendor or payee name; and
(h) Description or memo field.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each school district and
charter school shall maintain a financial ledger on its publicly accessible website. The
homepage of each public or charter school's website shall include a direct link to the
financial ledger of the school district or charter school that has oversight responsibility
for that public or charter school. The link shall make the financial ledger accessible
within one click, shall be clearly labeled as a link to the school district's or charter
school's financial ledger, and shall be functional and mobile-responsive. The
department may provide standardized language or icons that public and charter
schools may use for the purpose of ensuring compliance with this subsection.
3. A school district's or charter school's financial ledger shall be updated at least
monthly. Details of each calendar month's financial transactions shall be posted no later
than forty-five days after the close of that calendar month.
4. For historical record keeping purposes, a school district or charter school
shall maintain complete financial ledger data on its publicly accessible website for no
fewer than five prior fiscal years.
5. A school district or charter school may redact protected personal information
on the financial ledger only to the extent required by applicable law. Vendor names,
amounts, and accounting codes shall not be redacted. Payroll data may be presented in
aggregated form where disclosure of individual information is restricted.
6. Debt obligations shall be posted in a separate section of the financial ledger,
with disclosure of the following information:
(1) Outstanding debt balances;
(2) Issuance dates;
(3) Repayment schedules;
(4) Annual debt service amounts; and

HCS SB 1351 11
(5) Debt service as a percentage of total expenditures.
7. The department may provide or approve standardized templates or platforms
a school district or charter school may use to comply with the provisions of this section.
A school district or charter school may use a third-party template or platform that is
approved by the department.
8. The department may provide guidance to assist school districts and charter
schools in complying with the provisions of this section. Such guidance may include:
(1) High-level expenditure summaries by classification category under the
Missouri financial accounting manual;
(2) Standardized definitions of terms to be used in the financial ledger; and
(3) Clear explanations of methodology and limitations applicable to the
compilation and presentation of financial ledger data.
9. School districts and charter schools shall annually certify compliance with this
section to the department. The department shall promulgate rules establishing
procedures and timelines for school districts and charter schools to certify compliance.
10. If the department finds that any school district or charter school has violated
a provision of this section, the department may withhold up to five percent of the state
aid to which the school district or charter school is entitled under chapter 160 or 163 for
the current school year until the school district or charter school proves to the
satisfaction of the department that the school district or charter school is no longer in
violation of this section.
11. The department shall establish a process for members of the public to file
complaints with the department if they believe a school district or charter school has
violated any provision of this section. The department may establish a public
compliance dashboard on the department's website to enable members of the public to
check whether a particular school district or charter school is certified as in compliance
with the provisions of this section.
12. The department shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.

HCS SB 1351 12
162.481. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 162.492 and
162.563, all elections of school directors in urban school districts shall be held biennially at
the same times and places as municipal elections.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 4, [and] 5, and 7 of this section,
hereafter when a seven-director district becomes an urban school district, the directors of the
prior seven-director district shall continue as directors of the urban school district until the
expiration of the terms for which they were elected and until their successors are elected as
provided in this subsection. The first biennial school election for directors shall be held in the
urban school district at the time provided in subsection 1 which is on the date of or
subsequent to the expiration of the terms of the directors of the prior district which are first to
expire, and directors shall be elected to succeed the directors of the prior district whose terms
have expired. If the terms of two directors only have expired, the directors elected at the first
biennial school election in the urban school district shall be elected for terms of six years. If
the terms of four directors have expired, two directors shall be elected for terms of six years
and two shall be elected for terms of four years. At the next succeeding biennial election held
in the urban school district, successors for the remaining directors of the prior seven-director
district shall be elected. If only two directors are to be elected they shall be elected for terms
of six years each. If four directors are to be elected, two shall be elected for terms of six years
and two shall be elected for terms of two years. After seven directors of the urban school
district have been elected under this subsection, their successors shall be elected for terms of
six years.
3. In any school district in which a majority of the district is located in any home rule
city with more than one hundred fifty-five thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants, elections shall be held annually at the same times and places as general municipal
elections for all years where one or more terms expire, and the terms shall be for three years
and until their successors are duly elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after
August 28, 1998.
4. For any school district which becomes an urban school district by reason of the
2000 federal decennial census, elections shall be held annually at the same times and places
as general municipal elections for all years where one or more terms expire, and the terms
shall be for three years and until their successors are duly elected and qualified for all
directors elected on and after August 28, 2001.
5. In any school district in any county with a charter form of government and with
more than three hundred thousand but fewer than four hundred fifty thousand inhabitants
which becomes an urban school district by reason of the 2010 federal decennial census,
elections shall be held annually at the same times and places as general municipal elections
for all years where one or more terms expire, and the terms shall be for three years and until

HCS SB 1351 13
their successors are duly elected and qualified for all directors elected on and after April 2,
2012.
6. In any urban school district in a county of the first classification with more than
eighty-three thousand but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants and with a home rule
city with more than seventy-six thousand but fewer than ninety-one thousand inhabitants as
the county seat, elections shall be held annually at the same times and places as general
municipal elections for all years where one or more terms expire, and upon expiration of any
term after August 28, 2015, the term of office shall be for three years and until their
successors are duly elected and qualified.
7. In any school district in which a majority of the district is located in a city
with more than one hundred five thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty-five
thousand inhabitants, elections shall be held annually at the same times and places as
general municipal elections for all years where one or more terms expire, and upon the
expiration of any term after August 28, 2026, the term of office shall be for three years
and until their successors are duly elected and qualified.
162.821. The district secretary shall keep a record of the proceedings of all annual
and special elections of the voters of the district and of the proceedings of the board of
education. He shall make copies of the election notices, contracts with teachers, certificates
and all other papers relating to the business of the district, and securely keep the same. He
shall maintain a correct plat of the district and shall promptly notify the department of
elementary and secondary education and the county clerk of each county affected of all
changes in the boundaries of the district. He shall transmit to the county commission and to
the state department of elementary and secondary education, on or before the fifteenth day of
August in each year, a report embracing the following items:
(1) The number of children, male and female, attending the public schools during the
year;
(2) Total number of days' attendance by all such children;
(3) The number of days the public schools of the district have been maintained during
the school year;
(4) The number of teachers employed, male and female, and the wages per month of
each;
(5) Estimated value of school property owned and managed by the district;
(6) Assessed valuation of the district;
(7) Rate of school tax on the assessed valuation of the district;
(8) Cash on hand at the beginning of the year;
(9) Tuition fees received and credited to the teachers' fund of the district;
(10) Public funds received by county treasurer;

HCS SB 1351 14
(11) District tax received by county (or township) treasurer;
(12) Amount paid on teachers' wages;
(13) Amount paid for incidental expenses;
(14) Amount expended for purchasing site, erecting schoolhouses, rent and repairs;
(15) Amount expended in cancelling bonded indebtedness and paying interest on
same;
(16) Amount expended for library;
(17) Amount expended for legal services. If the report does not include the
amount expended for legal services, then the attorney general may investigate the
violation of this subdivision and may bring a civil action, including an action for
injunctive relief, against the school district or charter school. Such action shall be
brought in the county where the school district or charter school is located;
(18) Cash on hand at the end of the year;
[(18)] (19) Such other information as may be required by the state board of education.
167.1001. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Election", any primary, general, or special election held to nominate or elect
an individual to public office, to retain or recall an elected officeholder, or to submit a
ballot measure to the voters;
(2) "Parent", a student's parent, legal guardian, or person standing in loco
parentis to the student;
(3) "School", any public school governed and managed by an urban school
district.
2. A student shall not be considered absent from the school in which the student
is enrolled for the time during which the student accompanies his or her parent when
the parent is exercising his or her right to vote in a scheduled election.
3. A student may receive an excused absence pursuant to subsection 2 of this
section only one time during each scheduled election.
4. A student who accompanies his or her parent when the parent is exercising his
or her right to vote in a scheduled election shall be encouraged by school officials to
demonstrate his or her attendance at the scheduled election by wearing an official
sticker, badge, or other item upon his or her return to school indicating that he or she
attended the scheduled election.
170.027. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Integrated Safe Driving Program".
2. As used in this section, "driver education instruction" means instruction
provided under the Missouri integrated safe driving program that offers instruction in
the use and operation of motor vehicles including, but not limited to, instruction in the

HCS SB 1351 15
safe operation of motor vehicles and rules of the road and the laws of this state relating
to motor vehicles.
3. (1) The state department of elementary and secondary education shall receive
and vet sample lessons from recognized statewide professional organizations and
districts that meet the requirements of the Missouri integrated safe driving program.
(2) Sample lessons shall be made available to each public school district and
charter school offering courses to pupils in grades nine through twelve.
(3) For the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years, each public
school district and charter school offering courses to pupils in grades nine through
twelve may adopt a plan implementing the Missouri integrated safe driving program,
which may use the sample lessons.
4. The Missouri integrated safe driving program shall:
(1) Inform pupils about the requirements for obtaining and driving with an
instruction permit, an intermediate license, and a full driver license under Missouri's
graduated driver license law as established in chapter 302;
(2) Emphasize the development of knowledge, attitudes, habits, and skills
necessary for the safe operation of motor vehicles;
(3) Provide instruction on distracted driving as a major traffic safety issue;
(4) Provide instruction concerning law enforcement procedures for traffic stops,
including a demonstration of the proper actions to be taken during a traffic stop and
appropriate interactions with law enforcement;
(5) Provide pupils with current data on driver safety related to risky behaviors;
and
(6) Provide instruction on safety concerns relating to pedestrians, commercial
motor vehicles, motorcycles and other potentially hazardous encounters on the road.
5. Districts may require pupils to participate in lessons devoted to addressing the
requirements of the Missouri integrated safe driving program in courses as determined
by the district. These lessons shall meet standards within the content of the course but
use safe driving as the context and application of the course standards.
6. (1) The driver education instruction under this section shall not require any
pupil to physically operate a motor vehicle as part of such instruction.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit any public school district or
charter school from offering an elective driver education course that is different from
the driver education instruction required under this section.
7. The state board of education may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this

HCS SB 1351 16
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
and void.
186.085. The literacy advisory council established under section 186.080 shall
provide advice on the inclusion of instruction and assessment of cursive writing and
reading, including the optimal role for the use of cursive writing and reading in
promoting literacy for all students. Such advice shall include recommendations for a
related model policy on cursive.
186.095. 1. The commissioner of education shall establish a "Framework on
Classroom Use of Screens Council" or "FOCUS Council". The council shall consist of
the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, who shall serve as chair of the
council. The other members of the council shall be appointed as specified in this
subsection and shall include the following:
(1) One parent of a child currently enrolled in kindergarten through grade five
shall be selected by the president pro tempore of the senate;
(2) One parent of a child currently enrolled in kindergarten through grade five
shall be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) One education professional selected by the state board of education from
names submitted to it by the professional teachers' organizations of the state;
(4) One education professional selected by a statewide association of Missouri
school boards;
(5) One education professional selected by the state board of education from
names submitted to it by a statewide coalition of school administrators;
(6) Two education professionals selected by the president pro tempore of the
senate in addition to the member selected under subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(7) Two education professionals selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives in addition to the member selected under subdivision (2) of this
subsection;
(8) One education professional selected by the governor;
(9) One education professional selected by the lieutenant governor;
(10) One education professional selected by the commissioner of the department
of higher education and workforce development;

HCS SB 1351 17
(11) One education professional selected by the state board of education from
names submitted to it by nationally recognized career and technical education student
organizations operating in Missouri;
(12) One education professional selected by the state board of education from
names submitted to it by the heads of state-approved baccalaureate-level teacher
preparation programs located in Missouri;
(13) A pediatric mental health professional or board-certified behavioral analyst
licensed in the state, preferably with experience in technology and behavioral responses,
selected by the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(14) A medical professional with expertise in child health and development
selected by the governor.
2. The department elementary and secondary education shall provide necessary
staff and resources for the work of the advisory council.
3. (1) The council shall meet at least four times per year in its initial year and at
least twice per year thereafter to conduct a comprehensive survey and analysis of screen
time and instructional technology use in public schools and to review best practices
regarding screen use and the use of technology in instruction and related policy
provisions. Items and information related to such best practices and policies shall
include, but not be limited to:
(a) Impacts on educational outcomes;
(b) Impacts on behavioral and discipline outcomes;
(c) Impacts on special education;
(d) Impacts on early childhood brain development, including reading and
writing skills;
(e) The deterioration of student competency in reading, writing, arithmetic, and
science;
(f) The need to strengthen human connection in classrooms and support healthy,
respectful relationships;
(g) The isolation of students in a digital and virtual world; and
(h) Other such items and information to be determined by the council.
(2) The council shall meet for the first time for purposes of this subsection before
December 1, 2026, and the whole council or a subcommittee thereof shall hold at least
three additional meetings for purposes of this subsection before July 1, 2027.
(3) On or before July 1, 2027, the council shall submit a report containing the
council's actions, findings, recommendations, and policy proposals to the state board of
education, the governor, and the joint committee on education.

HCS SB 1351 18
(4) The recommendations shall include a recommended model school board
policy on screen time and instructional technology use. The model policy shall
recommend best practices regarding:
(a) Student screen time;
(b) Student use of instructional technology;
(c) Restrictions on student screen time;
(d) Restrictions on student use of instructional technology;
(e) Restrictions on student access to internet-connected instructional technology;
(f) Student use of manipulatives and traditional materials;
(g) The process for a parent or guardian to obtain information regarding his or
her child's screen time and instructional technology use;
(h) Minimizing or eliminating school district- or charter school-issued devices or
school district or charter school educational technology being used outside the school
day; and
(i) The process for a parent or guardian to limit or eliminate his or her child's
screen time and instructional technology use.
(5) The recommendations may include suggested changes to state law.
(6) The report shall be presented to the state board of education and to the joint
committee on education in public hearings. The report shall be updated at least every
two years to provide additional information regarding the council's actions,
recommendations, and policy proposals.
✔